Massachusetts, session 194th, H5097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 17 and 17A of chapter 138 of the General
Laws, the licensing authority of the city of Salem may convert 1 seasonal license for the sale of
all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under section 12 of said chapter 138,
currently issued to Amazing Pizza LLC d/b/a Amazing Pizza and used at 62 Wharf Street to an
annual license for the sale of wine and malt beverages and cordials to be drunk on the premises
under said section 12 of said chapter 138 to Amazing Pizza LLC d/b/a Amazing Pizza and used
at 62 Wharf Street. The license converted under this section shall be subject to all of said chapter
138 except sections 17 and 17A.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license converted
pursuant to this section to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the
same location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of
revenue and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license
of 3

is in good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions
have been paid.
(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license converted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority which
may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location and under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license shall
dissolve.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding sections 17 and 17A of chapter 138 of the General
Laws, the licensing authority of the city of Salem may convert 1 seasonal license for the sale of
all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under section 12 of said chapter 138,
currently issued to Maitland Farm LLC d/b/a Maitland Farm Kitchen and Spirits and used at 84
Derby Street to an annual license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the
premises under said section 12 of said chapter 138 to Maitland Farm LLC d/b/a Maitland Farm
Kitchen and Spirits and for use at 84 Derby Street. The license converted under this section shall
be subject to all of said chapter 138 except sections 17 and 17A.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license converted under
this section to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have
been paid.
of 3

(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license converted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority which
may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location and under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license shall
dissolve.
SECTION 3. (a) The city of Salem may charge a fee for the conversion of the licenses
authorized in sections 1 and 2 which shall be paid by the licensee at the time of issuance unless
the licensing authority agrees to enter into a contract with the licensees to allow the division of
the fee into multiple payments over time from the licensees. If the city elects to accept multiple
payments over time from the licensees, the option shall be made available, upon request, to all
qualified applicants for a license.
(b) Any fee collected by the city of Salem for the licenses converted pursuant to sections
1 and 2, which are greater than the amount of the fees charged for an annual renewal of a similar
license issued by the city shall be deposited into the city's economic development account and
expended by it in a manner consistent with the purposes of such account.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3